Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.320

State board for volunteer firefighters and reserve officers—State actuary to provide actuarial services.

The state actuary shall provide actuarial services for the state board.

[ 1999 c 148 s 28; 1989 c 91 s 25.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 91: See note following RCW 41.24.010.